Utah statutes.
72-1-303.   Duties of commission.

(1)  The commission has the following duties:

(a)  determining priorities and funding levels of projects in the state transportation systems for each fiscal year based on project lists compiled by the department;

(b)  determining additions and deletions to state highways under Chapter 4, Designation of State Highways Act;

(c)  holding public hearings and otherwise providing for public input in transportation matters;

(d)  making policies and rules in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, necessary to perform the commission's duties described under this section;

(e)  in accordance with Section 63G-4-301, reviewing orders issued by the executive director in adjudicative proceedings held in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act;

(f)  advising the department in state transportation systems policy;

(g)  approving settlement agreements of condemnation cases subject to Section 63G-10-401;

(h)  in accordance with Section 17B-2a-807, appointing a commissioner to serve as a nonvoting, ex officio member or a voting member on the board of trustees of a public transit district;

(i)  in accordance with Section 17B-2a-808, reviewing, at least annually, the short-term and long-range public transit plans; and

(j)  reviewing administrative rules made, amended, or repealed by the department.

(2) (a)  For projects prioritized with funding provided under Sections 72-2-124 and 72-2-125, the commission shall annually report to a committee designated by the Legislative Management Committee:

(i)  a prioritized list of the new transportation capacity projects in the state transportation system and the funding levels available for those projects; and

(ii)  the unfunded highway construction and maintenance needs within the state.

(b)  The committee designated by the Legislative Management Committee under Subsection (2)(a) shall:

(i)  review the list reported by the Transportation Commission; and

(ii)  make a recommendation to the Legislature on:

(A)  the amount of additional funding to allocate to transportation; and

(B)  the source of revenue for the additional funding allocation under Subsection (2)(b)(ii)(A).

(3)  The commission shall review and may approve plans for the construction of a highway facility over sovereign lakebed lands in accordance with Chapter 6, Part 3, Approval of Highway Facilities on Sovereign Lands Act.



Amended by Chapter 256, 2011 General Session

